Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3,121
Violations; penalty.

Any person convicted for violation of section 44-3,119 or 44-3,120 shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1969, c. 352, § 3, p. 1232;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 240.